District of Columbia statutes.
11-941

Issuance of warrants; record.

Subject to Title 23, judges of the Superior Court may, at any time, including Sundays and legal holidays, on complaint or application under oath or actual view, issue warrants for arrest, search or seizure, or electronic surveillance in connection with crimes and offenses committed within the District of Columbia, or for administrative inspections in connection with laws relating to the public health, safety, and welfare. Each proceeding respecting a warrant shall be recorded as prescribed by the court. Warrants shall be issued free of charge.

July 29, 1970, 84 Stat. 487, Pub. L. 91-358, title I, § 111
This section is referenced in § 8-231.05 and § 8-231.06.
1981 Ed., § 11-941.
1973 Ed., § 11-941.